Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-803
Public service entity; failure to furnish statement or information; penalty; waiver.

For each day's failure to furnish the statement required by section 77-801 or for each day's failure to furnish the information as required on those statements, the public service entity may be assessed a penalty in the amount of one hundred dollars, except that the penalty shall not exceed ten thousand dollars. Such penalty shall be collected by the Tax Commissioner and credited to the Department of Revenue Property Assessment Division Cash Fund. The Tax Commissioner, in his or her discretion, may waive all or part of the penalty provided in this section.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 77, p. 411;

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 81, p. 412;

Laws 1911, c. 104, § 9, p. 375;

R.S.1913, §§ 6367, 6371;

Laws 1921, c. 133, art. IX, § 3, p. 587;

C.S.1922, § 5892;

C.S.1929, § 77-803;

R.S.1943, § 77-803;

Laws 1986, LB 732, § 3;

Laws 1986, LB 817, § 6;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 89;

Laws 1997, LB 270, § 43;

Laws 1999, LB 36, § 17;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 50.